Utah statutes.
53B-1-105.   Appointment of commissioner of higher education -- Qualifications -- Duties.

(1) (a)  The board, upon approval from the governor and with the consent of the Senate for each appointee nominated on or after May 8, 2012, shall appoint a commissioner of higher education to serve at its pleasure as its chief executive officer.

(b)  The commissioner may be terminated by:

(i)  the board; or

(ii)  the governor, after consultation with the board.

(c)  The board shall:

(i)  set the salary of the commissioner;

(ii)  prescribe the duties and functions of the commissioner; and

(iii)  select a commissioner on the basis of outstanding professional qualifications.

(2)  The commissioner is responsible to the board to:

(a) ensure that the policies and programs of the board are properly executed;

(b)  furnish information about the state system of higher education and make recommendations regarding that information to the board;

(c)  provide state-level leadership in any activity affecting an institution in the state system of higher education; and

(d)  perform other duties assigned by the board in carrying out its duties and responsibilities.

